Idaho, session 2025, S1145.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 18, Title 33, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 33-1812, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
33-1812. EARLY LITERACY READINESS PROGRAM. (1) Each school district
and public charter school may establish an early literacy readiness program
to ensure that students entering kindergarten are prepared to develop the
literacy skills needed for future learning. The program shall support stu-
dents in achieving the goal of reading at or above grade level by the end
of grade 3 and assist students in achieving growth and proficiency on the
statewide literacy assessment.
(2) The program shall be available to students four (4) and five (5)
years of age who reside within school district boundaries.
(3) The program shall be age-appropriate, evidence-based, and aligned
with the science of reading. The focus of the program shall be developing
foundational reading skills, including, at a minimum, phonemic awareness,
phonics, fluency, vocabulary, and text comprehension.
(4) The program shall include a parental involvement and engagement
component that allows parents to participate in the student's learning at
school or at home.
(5) School districts and public charter schools may use existing lit-
eracy intervention funds received pursuant to section 33-1002(2)(r), Idaho
Code. The reporting requirements under section 33-1807(6), Idaho Code,
shall apply to this program.
(6) The state board of education or its designee shall annually evalu-
ate the cost and efficacy of early literacy readiness programs established
throughout Idaho pursuant to this section.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.